Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0771.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 12751. As used in sections 12752 to 12758 and part 128:
(a) "Acceptable alternative greywater system" means a system
class of alternative systems for the treatment and disposal of
waste water which normally does wastewater that do not receive
human body wastes or industrial waste and is are approved for use
by a local health department.
(b) "Acceptable innovative or alternative waste treatment
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


system" means a decentralized or individual class of alternative
waste system which has been treatment systems that are approved for
use by a local health department and which is are properly operated
and maintained so as not to cause a health hazard or nuisance. An
acceptable innovative or alternative waste treatment system may
include, but is not limited to, an organic waste treatment system
or compost toilet which that operates on the principle of
decomposition of heterogeneous organic materials feces or other
excreta from the human body by aerobic and facultatively anaerobic
organisms and utilizes an effectively aerobic composting process
which that produces a stabilized humus. Acceptable innovative or
alternative waste treatment system does not include a septic
tankdrain field tank and soil dispersal system or any other system
which that is determined by the department to pose a similar threat
to the public health, safety, and welfare, and the quality of
surface water and subsurface waters groundwater of this state.
(c) "Available public sanitary sewer system" means a public
sanitary sewer system located in a right of way, easement, highway,
street, or public way which that crosses, adjoins, or abuts upon on
the property and passing passes not more than 200 feet at the
nearest point from a structure in which sanitary sewage originates.
(d) "Department" means the department of environment, Great
Lakes, and energy.
(e) "Holding tank" means a system that utilizes all of the
following to collect sanitary sewage:
(i) A septic tank with no outlet and that does not allow
clarified liquid effluent to discharge for additional treatment by
a soil dispersal system.
(ii) The services of a person engaged in septage waste
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


servicing.
(iii) Offsite disposal treatment at approved locations in
accordance with part 117 of the natural resources and environmental
protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.11701 to 324.11721.
(f) (d) "Person" means a person as defined in section 1106 or
a governmental entity.
(g) (e) "Public sanitary sewer system" means a sanitary sewer
or a combined sanitary and storm sewer used or intended for use by
the public for the collection and transportation of sanitary sewage
for treatment or disposal.
(h) (f) "Structure in which sanitary sewage originates" or
"structure" means a building in which toilet, kitchen, laundry,
bathing, or other facilities which that generate water-carried
sanitary sewage are used or are available for use for household,
commercial, industrial, or other purposes.
(i) "Violation notice" means a written notice or formal
enforcement action by the department or local health department in
response to a violation of this part or part 128.
Sec. 12752. (1) Public sanitary sewer systems are essential to
the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the this state.
Septic tank disposal Onsite wastewater treatment systems are
subject to failure due to soil conditions or other reasons. Failure
recognized as a cost-effective, long-term option for meeting public
health and water quality goals when the onsite wastewater treatment
system is properly managed. When an onsite wastewater treatment
system is not properly managed, failure or potential failure of
septic tank disposal systems an onsite wastewater treatment system
poses a threat to the public health, safety, and welfare; presents
a potential for ill health, transmission of disease, mortality, and
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


economic blight; may constitute a nuisance; and constitutes a
threat, or that is or may become injurious to, to the quality of
surface water and subsurface waters groundwater of this state. The
connection to available public sanitary sewer systems at the
earliest, reasonable date is a matter for the protection of the
public health, safety, and welfare and necessary in the public
interest which that is declared as a matter of legislative
determination.
(2) Onsite wastewater treatment systems and premises or
structures that are not connected to a public sanitary sewer system
are subject to regulation under part 128. Local health departments
shall implement and enforce this part and any rules promulgated
under this part, except sections 12753, 12754, and 12756, unless
otherwise delegated, and part 128 and rules promulgated under that
part under any applicable provisions of this act.
(3) The department or a local health department may inspect,
evaluate, investigate, or authorize an inspection, evaluation, or
investigation to be made, to ensure compliance with this part and
part 128. The right for a local health department to inspect or
investigate, as provided under section 2446, applies to the
department and a local health department when utilized in this part
and part 128. The rights and responsibilities pertaining to the
department of health and human services obtaining a warrant, as
provided under sections 2241 to 2247, also apply to either the
department or a local health department when utilized in accordance
with this part and part 128. At any reasonable time, an authorized
representative of the department or local health department may
enter on private or public property for the purpose of inspecting
and investigating conditions or practices that may be in violation
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


of this part or part 128. An investigation or inspection under this
subsection must comply with the United States Constitution and the
state constitution of 1963. Failure to comply with requests to
inspect or investigate is subject to a violation notice issued by
the department and further enforcement action, including, when
necessary, referral to the department of attorney general. The
department or a local health department may collect reasonable fees
as authorized by section 2444 for services associated with
administering an onsite wastewater treatment program. The
department or an authorized local health department shall add a
$5.00 public education and training fund fee to the application
fees collected under this subsection. A public education and
training fund fee collected under this subsection by a local health
department must be forwarded to the department quarterly.
(4) The public education and training fund is created as a
revolving fund in the department of treasury. The state treasurer
shall deposit the public education and training fund fees collected
under subsection (3) and money from any other source into the
public education and training fund. The state treasurer shall
direct the investment of the public education and training fund and
credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments.
Money that remains in the public education and training fund at the
end of the fiscal year carries forward into the next fiscal year.
The department is the administrator of the public education and
training fund and shall expend money from the fund to provide both
of the following:
(a) Public education and outreach regarding onsite wastewater
treatment systems.
(b) Training to local health departments, evaluators, the
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


department, and agents of the department.
(5) All of the following are subject to the requirements
described under this part and part 128:
(a) A premises or structure.
(b) An outhouse, as that term is defined in section 12771.
(c) An innovative waste treatment system described under
section 12757.
(d) An onsite wastewater treatment system.
(e) The owner of or a person that is responsible for any of
the items described under subdivisions (a) to (d).
(6) An owner of an onsite wastewater treatment system is
responsible to respond and remedy nuisances or conditions that meet
the definition of failure in compliance with this part and part
128, and the rules promulgated under section 12817.
(7) As used in this section, "failure" and "onsite wastewater
treatment system" mean those terms as defined in section 12801.
Sec. 12757. (1) Notwithstanding sections 12752 to 12756 and
part 128, a person may install and use in a structure an acceptable
innovative or alternative waste treatment system or an acceptable
innovative or alternative waste treatment system in combination
with an acceptable alternative greywater system. The installation
and use of an acceptable innovative or alternative waste treatment
system or an acceptable innovative or alternative waste treatment
system in combination with an acceptable alternative greywater
system in a structure shall be is subject to regulation by the
local health department in accordance with the statewide sewage
code promulgated under section 12817, and the ordinances and
regulations of the local units of government in which the structure
lies. is located. A local health department may inspect each
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


acceptable innovative or alternative waste treatment system within
its jurisdiction at least once each year to determine if it is
being properly operated and maintained. A local health department
may charge the owner of an acceptable innovative or alternative
waste treatment system a reasonable fee for such an inspection and
for the plan review and installation inspection. A copy of the
approved application or permit to install and use an alternative
acceptable innovative waste treatment system and a copy of each
maintenance inspection report shall must be forwarded to the
department and to the local unit of government and local health
department in which the structure lies. is located. The department
shall maintain a record of approved alternative systems an approved
acceptable innovative waste treatment system and their its
maintenance and operation.
(2) The department , after consultation with the state
plumbing board, shall adopt guidelines promulgate rules under
section 12817 to assist local health departments in determining
what are acceptable alternative greywater systems and what are
acceptable innovative or alternative waste treatment systems. The
department shall advise local health departments regarding the
appropriate installation and use of acceptable innovative or
alternative waste treatment systems and acceptable innovative or
alternative waste treatment systems in combination with acceptable
alternative greywater systems.
(3) A person who that installs and uses an acceptable
innovative or alternative waste treatment system or an acceptable
innovative or alternative waste treatment system in combination
with an acceptable alternative greywater system shall is not be
exempt from any a special assessments assessment levied by a local
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


unit of government for the purpose of financing the construction of
an available public sanitary sewer system.
(4) Notwithstanding sections 12752 to 12756 and part 128, an
owner of a structure using that uses an acceptable innovative or
alternative waste treatment system in combination with an
acceptable alternative greywater system shall is not be required to
connect to an available public sanitary sewer system.
(5) An owner who of a structure that uses an acceptable
innovative waste treatment system that does not connect to an
available public sanitary sewer system pursuant to under subsection
(4) , shall is not be required to pay a connection or user fees fee
to a local unit of government except those a connection or user
fees which are fee that is allocated for financing of the
construction of an available public sanitary sewer system. In lieu
Instead of a connection or user fees, fee, an owner may be required
by the local unit of government to pay a sewer availability fee if
that fee is to be used for the purpose of paying a proportionate
share of financing the construction of an existing available public
sanitary sewer system. The exemption from the payment of a
connection or user fees fee under this subsection shall does not
apply to an owner connected to an available public sanitary sewer
system on the effective date of this act.or before March 31, 1981.
(6) A local unit of government may exempt an owner of a parcel
proposing to use an acceptable innovative or alternative waste
treatment system in combination with an acceptable alternative
greywater system from connection or user fees related to the
financing, construction, use, or maintenance of an available public
sanitary sewer system.
Sec. 12771. (1) A person shall not maintain, or permit allow
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


to be maintained, on premises owned or controlled by the person an
outhouse unless the outhouse is kept in a sanitary condition, and
constructed and maintained in a manner which that will not injure
or endanger the public health.
(2) The Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
department shall promulgate rules governing that govern the
construction and maintenance of outhouses to safeguard the public
health and to prevent the spread of disease and the existence of
sources of contamination. The statewide sewage code promulgated
under section 12817 supersedes administrative rules promulgated
under this subsection, as applicable.
(3) A person who that violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor. An outhouse not constructed or maintained as required
by this section or the rules promulgated pursuant to in accordance
with this section shall be is considered a public nuisance.
(4) As used in this section, "outhouse" means a building or
other structure not connected with to a sewer system or with a
properly installed and operated sewage disposal soil dispersal
system, and which is used for the reception, disposition, or
storage, either temporarily or permanently, of feces or other
excreta from the human body.
PART 128
ONSITE WASTEWATER TREATMENT SYSTEMS
Sec. 12801. (1) As used in this part and sections 12752 to
12758:
(a) "Alternative system" means a category of onsite wastewater
treatment systems that are not conventional systems and that
provide for an equivalent or better degree of protection for public
health and the environment than a conventional system.
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


(b) "Approved onsite wastewater treatment system" means an
alternative system or conventional system for which a construction
permit and any required operating permits have been issued by the
department or a local health department having jurisdiction and an
inspection has found the system to be in compliance with all
required permits.
(c) "Authorized local health department" means a local health
department authorized by the department to administer this part and
part 127 under section 12803 for conventional systems and section
12805 for alternative systems.
(d) "Baffle" means a precast or preconstructed component of a
septic tank that serves to redirect, divert, or impede the flow of
wastewater through the septic tank in a beneficial manner.
(e) "Change in use or an increase in use" means a new or
increased use of the groundwater of this state for the disposal of
sanitary sewage through an onsite wastewater treatment system,
through 1 or more of the following:
(i) Connection of a new structure to an existing onsite
wastewater treatment system.
(ii) Increase in use of the structure resulting in an increased
sanitary sewage flow rate that exceeds the system design capacity.
(iii) Change in purpose for which a structure or portion of a
structure is utilized or occupied between residential,
nonresidential, or another type of nonresidential use or occupancy.
(iv) Increase in the wastewater effluent strength.
(v) Any other change or increase in use that may reasonably be
expected to affect the ability of the onsite wastewater treatment
system to function as intended or perform as designed.
(f) "Construction permit" means a permit to install,
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


construct, alter, or repair an onsite wastewater treatment system.
(g) "Conventional system" means a category of onsite
wastewater treatment system that contains a watertight septic tank
and soil dispersal system that depends solely on subsurface soil
for treatment and dispersal and does not include any components of
an approved alternative technology.
(h) "Department" means the department of environment, Great
Lakes, and energy.
(i) "Effluent" means liquid flowing out of a component or
device.
(j) "Elements of a nonconforming system" means the presence of
1 or more of the following that may, as determined by an authorized
local health department, lead to a failure or improper functioning
of the onsite wastewater treatment system:
(i) Evidence of compaction or settling in the area of the
onsite wastewater treatment system that limits drainage in the area
of the system on the parcel, and rain and snow melt cannot
percolate through the system.
(ii) The soil dispersal system is hydraulically saturated.
(iii) Evidence of missing or damaged appurtenances of the onsite
wastewater treatment system.
(iv) Excessive biomatting is noted in 2 or more core samples
performed across the soil dispersal system that indicates that the
soil is no longer accepting effluent at a sufficient rate of
infiltration.
(v) Evidence of sustained operating levels within the septic
tank above the invert of the septic tank outlet.
(vi) The system includes a proprietary product or
nonproprietary technology that meets the definition of an
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


alternative system but that was not included in the construction
permit.
(vii) The system is located too close to a drinking water
supply well or surface waters as determined by the statewide sewage
code.
(viii) The system has insufficient soil depth below the soil
dispersal system to provide adequate wastewater treatment before
dispersal to the groundwater.
(ix) Other conditions that may reasonably be expected to alter
the intended functionality of the onsite wastewater treatment
system.
(k) "Evaluator" means an individual registered under section
12823.
(l) "Experimental onsite wastewater treatment system" means a
class of alternative onsite wastewater treatment system that is in
experimental use and requires further testing in order to provide
sufficient information to determine its acceptability.
(m) "Failure" means a malfunction or condition of an onsite
wastewater treatment system that consists of 1 or more of the
following, as determined by an authorized local health department:
(i) A discharge of sanitary sewage to the surface of the
ground.
(ii) A discharge of sanitary sewage or effluent into surface
water, storm drains, or directly into groundwater.
(iii) The inability of the onsite wastewater treatment system to
accept sanitary sewage at the rate being discharged, resulting in
the backup of sanitary sewage into a structure.
(iv) A structural failure or leaking of a septic tank or tanks
or other associated components and appurtenances.
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


(v) A discharge of treated wastewater that does not comply
with applicable standards established in the statewide sewage code.
(vi) An illicit connection or illicit discharge.
(vii) An absence of all or a key part of an onsite wastewater
treatment system, as determined in accordance with the statewide
sewage code.
(viii) The discharge of sanitary sewage or effluent is
endangering a public or private water supply.
(ix) The inability to access key parts of the onsite wastewater
treatment system.
(x) The authorized local health department determines that the
elements of a nonconforming system contribute to the overall
failure of the onsite wastewater treatment system in accordance
with the statewide sewage code.
(n) "Fund" means the onsite wastewater treatment system
administration fund created in section 12829.
(o) "Groundwater" means water in the ground that is in the
zone of saturation.
(p) "Illicit connection" means a physical, constructed
connection that allows the bypassing of required treatment by an
onsite wastewater treatment system in violation of law.
(q) "Illicit discharge" means any direct or indirect discharge
of sanitary sewage in violation of law.
(r) "Imminent danger" means a condition or practice that could
reasonably be expected to cause death, disease, or serious physical
harm immediately or before the imminence of the danger can be
eliminated through enforcement procedures.
(s) "Maintenance" means routine or periodic action taken to
ensure proper system performance, extend system longevity, and
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


ensure a system meets performance requirements as designed,
including servicing the system through cleaning, septic tank
pumping, effluent filter cleaning or replacements, flushing
laterals, vegetation removal, effluent sampling if applicable,
adjustments to subcomponents, and other actions as recommended by a
product manufacturer and in accordance with the statewide sewage
code.
(t) "Management" means the siting, design, permitting,
construction, installation, inspection, operation, maintenance,
alteration, evaluation, rejuvenation, closure, and repair of onsite
wastewater treatment systems to ensure that onsite wastewater
treatment systems meet required performance standards established
in the statewide sewage code that are protective of public health
and the environment.
(u) "Minor repair" means the act of fixing or replacing
substandard or damaged subcomponents, such as septic tank access
lids, safety devices, risers, septic tank outlet baffle or outlet
devices, switches, solid piping located outside the soil dispersal
system, pumps, valves, and other subcomponents as determined in
accordance with the statewide sewage code.
(v) "Nonproprietary technology" means a wastewater treatment
or distribution technology, method, or product not subject to a
patent or trademark.
(w) "Onsite wastewater treatment system" or "system" means a
system of components and appurtenances, also referred to as a
septic system, septic tank disposal system, sewage system, sewage
disposal system, or subsurface sewage disposal system, that is
used, or intended to be used, to collect, hold, and treat less than
10,000 gallons per day of sanitary sewage through 1 of the
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


following methods:
(i) Subsurface discharge to a soil dispersal system.
(ii) Subsurface discharge to another system that meets the
requirements of the statewide sewage code.
(iii) A holding tank, outhouse, innovative system, or other
component that collects and stores sanitary sewage until being
transported to an approved location for the necessary final
dispersal or final treatment.
(x) "Onsite wastewater treatment system evaluation" or
"evaluation" means an assessment of the sanitary sewage handling
methods where a premises or structure is not connected to a public
sanitary sewer system or an evaluation of an onsite wastewater
treatment system conducted under section 12821.
(y) "Operating level" means the elevation of effluent in a
tank. For a septic tank, operating level is determined by the
invert of the outlet piping.
(z) "Operating permit" means a renewable and revocable permit,
if required, to operate and maintain an onsite wastewater treatment
system in compliance with specific operational or performance
requirements.
(aa) "Outlet device" means any fixture on or around the outlet
pipe of a septic tank that serves to slow down, divert, screen, or
otherwise control the flow of effluent out of the septic tank.
(bb) "Point of sale" means the time at which the sale or
transfer of a parcel of real estate is complete. Point of sale does
not include a transfer described under section 3 of the seller
disclosure act, 1993 PA 92, MCL 565.953.
(cc) "Proprietary product" means a treatment or distribution
product held under a patent or trademark that significantly
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


contributes to the treatment, performance, and attainment of
effluent quality or dispersal objectives.
(dd) "Public sanitary sewer system" means that term as defined
in section 12751 that is operated by a local unit of government.
(ee) "Sanitary sewage" means treated or untreated waste that
contains 1 or more of the following:
(i) Feces or other excreta from the human body.
(ii) Waste generated as a result of food service establishment
activities.
(iii) Waste generated from sanitary conveniences, including, but
not limited to, toilets, urinals, sinks, showers, bathtubs,
dishwashers, garbage grinders, and household laundry fixtures
available for use associated with office, industrial, commercial,
recreational, institutional, or other purposes.
(iv) Additional domestic flow generated as part of a household
activity.
(ff) Sanitary sewage does not include roof runoff, building
footing drain, water softener backwash, commercial laundry
fixtures, wastes from industrial or commercial processes, and
stormwater.
(gg) "Septic tank" means a watertight, covered receptacle for
collection and treatment of sanitary sewage that does all of the
following:
(i) Receives the discharge of sanitary sewage.
(ii) Separates settleable and floating solids from the liquid.
(iii) Digests organic matter by anaerobic bacterial action.
(iv) Stores digested solids through a period of detention.
(v) Allows clarified liquid effluent to discharge for
additional treatment by components and appurtenances, such as a
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


soil dispersal system.
(vi) Attenuates flows.
(hh) "Soil dispersal system" means a method in which septic
tank effluent or treated effluent is distributed by a network of
piping or other approved material to an approved method of
subsurface dispersal.
(ii) "Statewide sewage code" means the rules promulgated under
section 12817 that provide for the management of onsite wastewater
treatment systems.
(jj) "Structure in which sanitary sewage originates" or
"structure" means a building in which toilet, kitchen, laundry,
bathing, or other facilities that generate water-carried sanitary
sewage are used or are available for use for household, commercial,
industrial, or other purposes.
(kk) "Surface water" means that term as defined in section
3112a of the natural resources and environmental protection act,
1994 PA 451, MCL 324.3112a.
(ll) "Technical advisory committee" means the technical
advisory committee established by the department under section
12815.
(2) In addition, article 1 contains general definitions and
principles of construction applicable to all articles of this code.
Sec. 12803. (1) Not later than 180 days after the department
promulgates rules under section 12817, a local health department
shall create a plan to implement and administer this part and part
127 for the management of conventional systems and submit the plan
to the department for authorization. Not later than 120 days after
the local health department submits the plan to the department, the
department shall review the plan to ensure the plan conforms to the
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


requirements in the statewide sewage code and provide corrective
guidance as necessary, and authorize the local health department to
administer this part for conventional systems. Not later than 1
year after the department promulgates rules under section 12817,
the local health department shall implement the approved plan to
administer this part for conventional systems. The local health
department shall do all of the following:
(a) Follow the standards established under this part and part
127, in accordance with section 2441, for the purposes of carrying
out the responsibilities of this part and part 127 and the
statewide sewage code, including authority to do all of the
following:
(i) Conduct preconstruction site evaluations, issue
construction permits, ensure installations are performed by
qualified individuals, as specified in the statewide sewage code,
and perform interim inspections during construction and final
inspections on completion of construction, if required.
(ii) Issue notices and penalties to persons that violate this
part, part 127, the rules promulgated under this part or part 127,
or the statewide sewage code, or endanger public health or the
environment.
(iii) Respond to complaints of failure of an onsite wastewater
treatment system or improper discharge of sanitary sewage.
(iv) Ensure long-term maintenance of onsite wastewater
treatment systems through construction permit requirements or the
issuance of operating permits, if applicable, for the management of
an onsite wastewater treatment system as described in the statewide
sewage code.
(v) Conduct evaluations under section 12821, as applicable.
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


(vi) Review variances in accordance with the statewide sewage
code.
(b) Maintain qualified staff to administer a conventional
onsite wastewater treatment system program. Except as otherwise
provided under subsection (2), a staff member shall meet the
following minimum educational and training requirements to work
independently in an onsite wastewater treatment system program:
(i) One of the following:
(A) Possess a minimum of a 4-year bachelor of science or arts
degree with a major in environmental health, chemistry, biology,
geology, engineering, or an equivalent degree.
(B) Meet the educational eligibility requirements for the
registered environmental health specialist or registered sanitarian
credential exam.
(ii) Obtain a minimum of 8 hours of training that includes a
minimum of 4 hours of field training on the United States
Department of Agriculture soil classification system from the
department or another entity approved by the department.
(iii) Demonstrate competency and understanding of the statewide
sewage code, criteria for onsite wastewater treatment systems
provided in state law and rules, or any successor state law and
rules, the land division act, 1967 PA 288, MCL 560.101 to 560.293,
and the condominium act, 1978 PA 59, MCL 559.101 to 559.276.
(iv) Conduct a minimum of 10 supervised preconstruction field
or site evaluations of conventional onsite wastewater system
designs and 10 supervised final inspections with senior staff or a
supervisor.
(v) Conduct a minimum of 5 solo preconstruction field
evaluations of onsite wastewater system designs and 5 solo final
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


inspections demonstrating understanding of the conventional onsite
wastewater treatment program as determined by senior staff or a
supervisor.
(vi) Attend and observe a minimum of 2 complete onsite
wastewater system installations.
(2) The following individuals are exempt from the requirements
of subsection (1)(b):
(a) A staff member of an authorized local health department
that has worked independently in an onsite wastewater treatment
system program for at least 3 years before the effective date of
the rules promulgated by the department under section 12817 and has
demonstrated competency and knowledge of onsite wastewater
treatment systems.
(b) A staff member that has limited duties within the onsite
wastewater treatment system program, has demonstrated competency
and knowledge, and is overseen by a sanitarian in accordance with
the rules promulgated under section 12817. As used in this
subdivision, "sanitarian" means that term as defined in section
18401.
Sec. 12805. (1) Not later than 180 days after the department
promulgates rules under section 12817, a local health department
shall create a plan to implement and administer this part and part
127 for the management of alternative systems and submit the plan
to the department for authorization. Not later than 120 days after
the local health department submits the plan to the department, the
department shall review the plan to ensure the plan conforms to the
requirements in the statewide sewage code and provide corrective
guidance as necessary, and authorize the local health department to
administer this part for alternative systems. Not later than 2
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


years after the department promulgates rules under section 12817,
the local health department shall implement the approved plan to
administer this part for alternative systems. The local health
department shall do all of the following:
(a) Meet the requirements of section 12803.
(b) Follow the standards established under this part, in
accordance with section 2441, for the purpose of carrying out the
responsibilities of this part, including authority to do all of the
following:
(i) Review, evaluate, approve, or reject applications, plans,
and specifications to alter, install, repair, or replace
alternative systems.
(ii) Issue construction permits authorizing the installation of
alternative systems in accordance with section 12807.
(iii) Ensure long-term maintenance of alternative systems
through the issuance of operating permits after an operation and
maintenance evaluation determines compliance.
(2) Existing local health department regulations or guidance
for a particular type of alternative system remain in effect until
minimum standards and criteria for that type of system are
developed by the department in accordance with section 12813.
(3) An authorized local health department that administers an
alternative system construction and operating permitting program
within its jurisdiction shall issue a construction permit for the
installation of an alternative system if all of the following
conditions are met:
(a) The alternative system does either of the following:
(i) Utilizes a proprietary product that is registered for use
by the department.
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


(ii) Utilizes nonproprietary technology in accordance with the
standards and guidance provided by the department in accordance
with the statewide sewage code.
(b) The soils, site conditions, and operating conditions at
the location are appropriate for the use of the alternative system
in compliance with the statewide sewage code.
(c) An acceptable management plan is developed and includes
operation and maintenance evaluations, in accordance with the
statewide sewage code.
(4) A person that installs and uses an alternative system is
not exempt from any special assessment levied by a local unit of
government for the purpose of financing the construction of an
available public sanitary sewer system.
(5) Notwithstanding this part and sections 12752 to 12756, an
owner of a structure that uses an alternative system is not
required to connect to an available public sanitary sewer system.
(6) An owner of a structure that uses an alternative system
that does not connect to an available public sanitary sewer system
under subsection (5) is not required to pay a connection or user
fee to a local unit of government, except a connection or user fee
that is allocated for financing the construction of an available
public sanitary sewer system. The local unit of government may
require the owner to pay a sewer availability fee if the fee is
used for the purpose of paying a proportionate share of the
financing of the construction of an existing available public
sanitary sewer system. The exemption from the payment of a
connection or user fee under this subsection does not apply to an
owner that is connected to an available public sanitary sewer
system on or before March 31, 1981.
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


Sec. 12807. (1) A person shall not install, construct, alter,
extend, repair, or replace an onsite wastewater treatment system
unless the person receives a construction permit from the
authorized local health department, and the department when
applicable, subject to any permit required under part 31 or 41 of
the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA
451, MCL 324.3101 to 324.3134 and 324.4101 to 324.4113. A person
does not need a construction permit under this section to conduct
maintenance on or for a minor repair to an onsite wastewater
treatment system that can be managed as described in the rules
promulgated under section 12817.
(2) A person shall obtain a construction permit for an onsite
wastewater treatment system from an authorized local health
department in compliance with this part and construct the system in
accordance with the statewide sewage code.
(3) A person that fails to obtain a construction permit or
comply with this part and part 127 is subject to enforcement action
by the local health department under section 12827.
(4) A governmental entity with building code authority shall
not issue a building permit for a structure, residence, or facility
served, or intended to be served, by an onsite wastewater treatment
system unless 1 of the following is obtained from the authorized
local health department:
(a) A construction permit for the onsite wastewater treatment
system.
(b) An authorization for the continued use of the onsite
wastewater treatment system.
(c) An authorization for a change in use or an increase in use
of the existing onsite wastewater treatment system.
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


(5) A governmental entity with building code authority shall
not issue a certificate of occupancy for a structure, residence, or
facility served by an onsite wastewater treatment system unless an
approved final inspection report was issued by the authorized local
health department or an authorization was obtained under subsection
(4)(b) or (c).
(6) A governmental entity with building code authority that
issues a building permit or certificate of occupancy without
obtaining a permit or authorization required under subsection (4)
or an approved final inspection report under subsection (5), as
applicable, may be subject to an enforcement action by the
department of licensing and regulatory affairs. The actions of the
department of licensing and regulatory affairs under this
subsection may include, but are not limited to, enforcement actions
against a building official or inspector as provided under the
skilled trades regulation act, 2016 PA 407, MCL 339.5101 to
339.6133.
Sec. 12811. (1) Subject to subsection (4), beginning 45 days
after the department promulgates rules under section 12817, a
person shall not install, construct, alter, or repair a proprietary
product unless that product is registered for use in this state by
the department and a construction permit is obtained under section
12807.
(2) Beginning 45 days after the department promulgates rules
under section 12817, a person may apply for registration of a
proprietary product under subsection (1) by submitting an
application on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department.
The department may charge a fee of $3,000.00 to cover its costs in
reviewing applications for registration under this section. Money
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


received by the department must be forwarded to the state treasurer
for deposit into the fund. Not later than 30 days after receipt of
an application and fee, the department shall review the application
and determine whether the application is administratively complete.
Not later than 60 days after receipt of an administratively
complete application, the department shall approve or deny the
registration and notify the applicant in writing. In approving and
registering a proprietary product for use in this state, the
department shall consider the recommended standards and guidance
provided by the technical advisory committee. A registration under
this section is specific to a product model within a brand or
manufacturer's line and is valid for 5 years. A registration must
be renewed in the same manner as an initial registration under this
subsection. Beginning 3 years after the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this section, and once every 3 years
thereafter, the department shall adjust the fee specified under
this subsection by an amount determined by the state treasurer at
the end of the preceding fiscal year to reflect the cumulative
percentage change in the Detroit Consumer Price Index, and rounded
to the nearest $100.00. As used in this subsection, "Detroit
Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of
consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from
the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of
Labor.
(3) The department may deny, suspend, or revoke a registration
under this section following a contested case hearing conducted in
accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA
306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, if the department finds any of the
following:
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


(a) The registration was obtained or was attempted to be
obtained through misrepresentation or fraud.
(b) The registrant transacted business under its registration
using fraudulent, coercive, or dishonest practices.
(c) The applicant or registrant failed to pay the required
registration application review fees.
(d) Field reviews, conducted in accordance with the statewide
sewage code, determine that the proprietary product does not
function or perform as designed.
(e) The proprietary product fails to meet the requirements of
the statewide code.
(4) An owner of an onsite wastewater treatment system does not
need to register a proprietary product under this section if both
of the following conditions are met:
(a) The proprietary product was installed as part of the
construction of an approved onsite wastewater treatment system
before the effective date of this part.
(b) The authorized local health department determines the
continued use of the proprietary product can be managed in
accordance with the statewide sewage code.
(5) The requirements of this section apply to a person that
represents a proprietary product manufacturer that is applying for
registration of a proprietary product under subsection (1) before
an installation that occurs after the effective date of this part.
Sec. 12813. The department shall develop minimum standards and
criteria for local health departments when permitting different
types of onsite wastewater treatment systems, including, but not
limited to, the following categories:
(a) Nonproprietary technologies such as sand filters.
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


(b) Proprietary products such as aerobic treatment systems and
packed bed filters.
(c) Proprietary products such as subsurface dripline products
or gravelless distribution products.
(d) Systems that have not been installed or constructed but
for which a construction permit was issued by the local health
department before the effective date of the statewide sewage code.
Sec. 12815. (1) The technical advisory committee is created in
the department to advise and provide recommendations to the
department regarding the rules promulgated under section 12817. The
technical advisory committee may advise the department on all of
the following:
(a) Recommended standards and guidance for the management of
onsite wastewater treatment systems.
(b) Nonproprietary technologies and recommended standards and
guidance for the use of nonproprietary technologies.
(c) Testing and design standards used for proprietary product
registration and recommended standards and guidance for use of
proprietary products.
(d) Recommended standards and guidance for alternative onsite
wastewater treatment systems and the severity of a failure of a
system.
(e) Onsite wastewater treatment system evaluation elements and
reporting.
(f) Registration, training, and educational requirements for
evaluators and other individuals involved in the installation,
maintenance, and evaluation of onsite wastewater treatment systems
that are consistent with trainings established by professional
organizations that represent decentralized wastewater management
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


professionals recognized by the department or recognized by another
entity approved by the department.
(g) Ethical standards for evaluators and other individuals
involved in the installation, maintenance, and evaluation of onsite
wastewater treatment systems that are consistent with the ethical
standards established by professional organizations that represent
decentralized wastewater management professionals recognized by the
department.
(h) Documentation required to be submitted to the department
for qualifying and registering evaluators under section 12823.
(i) Qualifications of individuals other than evaluators
involved in the management of onsite wastewater treatment systems.
(j) Continuing education requirements for individuals involved
in the management of onsite wastewater treatment systems.
(k) Recommended standards for implementing this part.
(l) Guidance and standards for registering practitioners that
construct and maintain onsite wastewater treatment systems.
(m) Recommended standards and guidance for owners of onsite
wastewater treatment systems for the maintenance of onsite
wastewater treatment systems.
(n) Recommended requirements for safety devices, which may
include, but are not limited to, standards for safety devices for
septic tanks that were installed or altered before the effective
date of the amendatory act that added this section.
(o) Recommended standards for septic tank access risers that
extend to the ground surface.
(p) Proposed conflict-of-interest system for evaluators and
individuals who install, construct, alter, or repair onsite
wastewater treatment systems. The conflict-of-interest system must
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


not preclude evaluators from owning businesses involved in the
installation, construction, alteration, or repair of onsite
wastewater treatment systems and must provide a means for an
evaluator or other individual to perform these services that may
result from an evaluation.
(q) Recommended requirements for evaluations that are in
addition to the requirements imposed under section 12821, including
but not limited to, all of the following:
(i) Standard operating procedures to determine septic tank
pumping requirements at the time of an evaluation and, if a septic
tank is pumped out, within 45 days before an evaluation.
(ii) Standard operating procedures for an evaluation conducted
if compaction may limit drainage, if a structure is not occupied or
in ordinary use, if the ground is frozen or snow covered, and if
access to the onsite wastewater treatment system is not feasible.
(iii) Tests and procedures for evaluators to perform to ensure
the validity of onsite wastewater treatment system evaluations.
(r) Proposed criteria for allowing the continued use of an
onsite wastewater treatment system that was constructed before the
effective date of the statewide sewage code if the use of an onsite
wastewater treatment system can be managed in a manner that does
all of the following:
(i) Ensures an effective level of treatment of sanitary sewage
determined to be necessary based on risk.
(ii) Protects public health and the environment.
(iii) Protects surface waters of this state.
(iv) Protects groundwater quality.
(2) The technical advisory committee must consist of the
following members who have technical or scientific knowledge
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


applicable to onsite wastewater treatment systems:
(a) All of the following voting members:
(i) Four regional local health department representatives
recommended by a state organization representing local health
departments. Of the 4 regional local health department
representatives appointed under this subdivision, 1 representative
must be from the northern Lower Peninsula, 1 representative must be
from the southeast Lower Peninsula, 1 representative must be from
the southwest Lower Peninsula, 1 representative must be from the
Upper Peninsula. The 4 members appointed under this subsection must
be appointed by the department.
(ii) One member appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(iii) One member appointed by the senate majority leader.
(iv) All of the following members appointed by the governor:
(A) One professional engineer.
(B) One distributor or supplier of onsite system products and
devices.
(C) One onsite wastewater system installer who has completed
training developed by the National Onsite Wastewater Recycling
Association or other professional organization that represents
decentralized wastewater management professionals recognized by the
department.
(D) One onsite wastewater system service provider that
represents septage waste servicing business licensed under part 117
of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA
451, MCL 324.11701 to 324.11721.
(E) One individual with knowledge of the use of onsite
wastewater treatment systems representing users of onsite
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


wastewater treatment systems.
(F) One representative from a state organization specializing
in the protection of public health and the environment through
improved water quality.
(G) One individual who has performed at least 10 evaluations
under preexisting onsite wastewater treatment system ordinances or
regulations.
(H) One soil scientist or academic representative specializing
in soil science.
(b) One nonvoting member who is a department representative
appointed by the director of the department.
(3) The members first appointed to the technical advisory
committee must be appointed not later than 90 days after the
effective date of the amendatory act that added this part.
(4) Members of the technical advisory committee shall serve
for terms of 4 years or until a successor is appointed, except that
of the members first appointed, 6 shall serve for 2 years, and 8
shall serve for 3 years.
(5) If a vacancy occurs on the technical advisory committee,
an individual must be appointed in the same manner as the original
appointment to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term.
(6) The governor may remove a member of the technical advisory
committee for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance,
misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause.
(7) Not later than 120 days after the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this section, the governor shall call the
first meeting of the technical advisory committee. At the first
meeting, the technical advisory committee shall create a charter or
bylaws, which includes the amount of and frequency at which the
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


technical advisory committee shall meet, as it considers necessary
or appropriate. The technical advisory committee shall meet if
requested by the department.
(8) Seven of the members of the technical advisory committee
constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting of
the technical advisory committee. A majority of the members present
and serving are required for official action of the technical
advisory committee.
(9) A meeting of the technical advisory committee may be
conducted in whole or in part electronically by telephonic or video
conferencing with remote participation.
(10) A writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or
retained by the technical advisory committee in the performance of
an official function is subject to the freedom of information act,
1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246.
(11) Members of the technical advisory committee shall serve
without compensation. However, members of the technical advisory
committee may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses
incurred in the performance of their official duties as members of
the technical advisory committee.
(12) The technical advisory committee shall consider the
following in its advice to the department:
(a) Sufficient theory and applied research to document
efficacy of onsite wastewater treatment systems.
(b) Potential use, local soil conditions, and other factors
that may affect the operation of onsite wastewater treatment
systems.
(c) Field performance data that confirm the product or
technology functions when installed onsite as indicated by
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


submitted documents.
(d) Certification of onsite wastewater treatment systems by
NSF International or another recognized certifying agency.
(13) The technical advisory committee may consult with experts
in the field of management of onsite wastewater treatment systems
and other individuals with knowledge and expertise in the
management of onsite wastewater treatment systems, which may
include, but are not limited to, any of the following:
(a) Hydrogeologists with hydrogeology field experience.
(b) Microbiologists.
(c) Other scientists or academics.
(d) Onsite wastewater treatment systems product manufacturers.
(e) Individuals whose premises or structure is served by an
approved onsite wastewater treatment system.
(f) Environmental organizations.
(g) Financial organizations.
(h) Home builders.
(i) Real estate licensees.
(j) Local units of government.
(k) Conservation districts.
(14) The department shall provide administrative support to
the technical advisory committee. The technical advisory
committee's initial advice and recommendations under subsection (1)
may be provided to the department not later than 2 years after the
effective date of the amendatory act that added this section.
Sec. 12817. Not later than 3 years after the effective date of
the amendatory act that added this part, the department, in
consultation with the technical advisory committee as provided
under section 12815, shall promulgate rules that establish a
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


statewide sewage code that complies with sections 12751 to 12833
and contains provisions for the management of onsite wastewater
treatment systems and performance-based standards for systems
categorized as conventional and alternative onsite wastewater
treatment systems that provide baseline protection for public
health and the environment. The statewide sewage code must include
all of the following provisions:
(a) Qualifications of any person involved in the installation
and management of onsite wastewater treatment systems.
(b) Standards for onsite wastewater treatment systems,
products, components, and devices.
(c) Standards for the installation of onsite wastewater
treatment systems.
(d) Standards for wastewater effluent.
(e) Standards for the continued use of an onsite wastewater
treatment system.
(f) Criteria for granting variances under sections 12803 and
12821.
(g) Any other requirement necessary to implement and carry out
this part and part 127.
Sec. 12818. A person that does either of the following is
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more
than 1 year or a fine of not more than $10,000.00 for each
violation, or both:
(a) Submits or provides to the department or authorized local
health department false, misleading, or fabricated information
related to an onsite wastewater treatment system.
(b) Knowingly completes an onsite wastewater treatment system
evaluation for purposes of compliance with section 12821(4) and is
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


not an evaluator.
Sec. 12821. (1) Beginning immediately after the department
promulgates rules under section 12817 and subject to subsection
(12), an owner of a premises or structure in which sanitary sewage
originates, that is not connected to a public sanitary sewer system
operated by a local unit of government must obtain an onsite
wastewater treatment system evaluation in accordance with the
schedule established under subsections (2) and (3).
(2) An onsite wastewater treatment system evaluation conducted
under this part, including an evaluation conducted under a point of
sale ordinance or regulation subject to section 12831, must be
conducted by an authorized local health department or evaluator in
accordance with this part and in accordance with the following
timeline:
(a) Within 10 years after the department promulgates rules
under section 12817, if the onsite wastewater treatment system is
20 years old or older on or before the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this section, and 1 or both of the
following conditions exist:
(i) The onsite wastewater treatment system is installed within
500 feet of any surface water or within a high risk erosion area,
critical dune, or 100-year floodplain, as these terms are
determined by the department.
(ii) The department or local health department does not have a
record of a construction permit being issued for the installation
of an onsite wastewater treatment system.
(b) Before a change in use or an increase in use of the
existing onsite wastewater treatment system.
(c) Any time in accordance with the statewide sewage code.
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


(d) Any time, if the evaluation is arranged or allowed by the
real property owner of a premises or structure.
(e) Within 10 years after the department promulgates rules
under section 12817, if the onsite wastewater treatment system is
30 years old or older on or before the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this section.
(3) After the first evaluation is conducted under subsection
(2), an onsite wastewater treatment system must be evaluated in
accordance with this section once every 10 years. Subject to the
statewide sewage code, after the first evaluation is conducted
under subsection (2), a local health department may determine that
an onsite wastewater treatment system does not require a subsequent
evaluation under this section if an approved onsite wastewater
treatment system is installed or corrective action, remedy, or
management steps are completed on the existing system. An owner of
a premises or structure not connected to a public sanitary sewer
that does not arrange for an evaluation under this subsection or
subsection (2) is not excluded from the requirement to arrange for
an evaluation. Beginning 10 years after the effective date of rules
promulgated by the department under section 12817, an onsite
wastewater treatment system must be evaluated every 10 years if the
system is 20 years old or older or if an evaluation was not
conducted under subsection (2) and the system is installed within
500 feet of surface water or within a high-risk erosion area,
critical dune, or 100-year floodplain, as determined by the
department.
(4) Not later than 10 years after the effective date of rules
promulgated under section 12817, a local health department may
submit an application on a form and in a manner prescribed by the
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


department to request an extension to the timeline requirements
under subsection (2). Not later than 60 days after a request for an
extension under this subsection is received, the department shall
grant or deny the extension. If the department denies the request
for an extension under this subsection, the department must state
the reasons for the denial in writing. An extension granted under
this subsection is valid for 1 year. A local health department may
apply for a subsequent extension in the same manner as an initial
extension under this subsection but may apply for not more than 2
extensions in total. The department shall consider all of the
following when determining whether to grant an extension under this
subsection:
(a) Documented lack of adequate funding to conduct
evaluations. Documentation under this subdivision must include, but
is not limited to, information on the financial standing of the
local health department and efforts made to raise funding,
including charging a fee as described under subsection (13).
(b) Documented lack of adequate evaluators or local health
department qualified staff to complete evaluations despite
documented efforts to hire needed staff.
(c) Documented inability to successfully complete the
evaluations required under subsection (2).
(5) An authorized local health department or evaluator shall
conduct an onsite wastewater treatment system evaluation not later
than 90 days after the owner of the system arranges for the
evaluation. An authorized local health department or evaluator may
work with individuals who are involved in the management of onsite
wastewater treatment systems, in accordance with the statewide
sewage code, to complete an evaluation under this subsection. An
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


authorized local health department shall not directly or indirectly
restrict or impair the ability of an evaluator to conduct an
evaluation within the authorized local health department's
jurisdiction. The owner of the system shall not have the septic
tank or tanks pumped out within 45 days before an onsite wastewater
treatment system evaluation is arranged under this section. At the
onsite wastewater treatment system evaluation, the authorized local
health department or evaluator shall do all of the following:
(a) Identify the size, age, and visible condition of the
septic tank or tanks.
(b) Before conducting any pumping, document the level of
effluent, in relation to the operating level in the septic tank or
tanks.
(c) Document the level of scum and sludge by measuring the
vertical column depth of each layer of stratified septic tank
contents for each tank or compartment and arrange for the services
of a septage waste servicing business licensed under part 117 of
the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA
451, MCL 324.11701 to 324.11721, to pump out the septic tank or
tanks, or recommend to the authorized local health department that
the septic tank or tanks be pumped out, if 1 of the following
applies:
(i) The authorized local health department or evaluator that
conducts the onsite wastewater treatment system evaluation
determines that it is necessary to complete the evaluation.
(ii) The sludge and scum accumulations within the septic tank
or tanks exceed 30% of each individual tank's volume or are
encroaching on the inlet or outlet.
(d) Verify that all sanitary sewage-related plumbing fixtures
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


are connected to the septic tank or tanks and are operational and
identify any sources of nonsanitary sewage-related connections to
the septic tank or tanks or the soil dispersal system that require
disconnection.
(e) Locate, expose, open, and assess the septic tank or tanks
and pumping chambers associated with the system. If the lid of any
septic tank or pumping chamber is greater than 12 inches below the
ground surface, the authorized local health department or evaluator
may require that the property owner uncover the lid or lids for
ease of access.
(f) If the system includes an alternative system or
proprietary product, identify that the required operation and
maintenance reporting is on file with the department or authorized
local health department. If the operation and maintenance reporting
are not up to date, notify the owner of the system of the need to
arrange for the required operation and maintenance by a qualified
service provider, subject to the statewide sewage code, and report
the findings to the authorized local health department. The
authorized local health department or evaluator shall assess and
report any unresolved issues identified in the required operation
and maintenance report.
(g) To the extent reasonable, locate, determine the size of,
and observe the subsurface dispersal system to determine its
condition.
(h) Document the location in relation to the site of any
attributes including, but not limited to, drinking water wells,
surface water, and other setbacks as required by the statewide
sewage code.
(i) Observe or find information regarding the location of a
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


well, as that term is defined in section 12701, and assess the
approximate distance between the nearest well and the onsite
wastewater treatment system, if applicable.
(j) Observe the general area that includes the treatment and
dispersal system for evidence of system failure or elements of a
nonconforming system.
(k) Examine the premises for an illicit discharge to,
including, but not limited to, the surface of the ground, surface
water, groundwater, or drain.
(l) Document conditions observed, evidence of failure, and
elements of a nonconforming system.
(m) Assess and report the ponding level found in inspection or
observation ports located in the soil dispersal system. If
inspection or observation ports are not found, or do not penetrate
to the bottom of the soil dispersal system, collect at least 2 core
samples across the soil dispersal system.
(n) Estimate the current daily sanitary sewage flow, identify
structure use type, and identity and collect information on the
proposed new or increase in use.
(o) Complete any other evaluation criteria set by the
department in the statewide sewage code.
(p) Prepare an evaluation report that contains the information
gathered under this subsection, including appropriate photographic
documentation taken at the evaluated premises.
(6) Not later than 14 days after the onsite wastewater
treatment system evaluation is completed, the authorized local
health department or evaluator that conducts the evaluation shall
do all of the following:
(a) Prepare an evaluation report that details the findings of
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


the onsite wastewater treatment system evaluation. An evaluation
report must be an objective and fact-based summary of conditions
observed on site at the time of the evaluation; must contain
information that follows standard report forms prescribed by the
department; and may contain recommendations to extend the life of
the onsite wastewater treatment system and prevent premature
failures of the system.
(b) Provide a printed or electronic copy of the evaluation
report to the owner of the onsite wastewater treatment system and
an electronic copy of the evaluation report to the authorized local
health department. An evaluation report must be provided under this
subsection even if the evaluation report is incomplete or the fee
provided for in subsection (13) or (14) was not paid.
(c) Provide a printed or electronic copy of the minimum
standards and criteria for conducting evaluations developed by the
department under section 12825(1) to the owner of the onsite
wastewater treatment system.
(7) An evaluation completed by an evaluator must be reviewed
by the authorized local health department. The authorized local
health department shall determine the need for pumping, elements of
a nonconforming system, determination of failure or imminent
danger, or resolution. Not later than 21 days after an evaluator
submits an evaluation report under subsection (6), the authorized
local health department must do all of the following:
(a) Based on the evaluation, determine the status of all of
the following:
(i) Whether the onsite wastewater treatment system is in
failure.
(ii) Whether elements of a nonconforming system are
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


contributing to an overall failure of the onsite wastewater
treatment system.
(iii) Whether elements of a nonconforming system are not
contributing to an overall failure and the onsite wastewater
treatment system meets a sufficient level of compliance and can be
managed in a manner to provide for the minimum level of protection
of public health and the environment to allow for continued use.
(iv) Whether the onsite wastewater treatment system meets a
sufficient level of compliance and can be managed to provide for
the minimum level of protection of public health and the
environment to allow for continued use.
(v) Whether the onsite wastewater treatment system is in
compliance with this part and the statewide sewage code.
(vi) Whether the evaluation report was unable to be completed
and the owner of premises or a structure not connected to public
sanitary sewer needs to take corrective actions to allow an
evaluator to complete an evaluation.
(b) Determine whether any corrective actions or management
steps must be taken by the owner of the onsite wastewater treatment
system to satisfy the requirements of the statewide sewage code and
this section.
(c) Determine whether the septic tank or tanks need to be
pumped and review the provided report for any pumping, to determine
if the relevant requirements of the statewide sewage code are
satisfied.
(d) Inform the owner of the onsite wastewater treatment system
of any determination made under subdivisions (a) to (c) and specify
an applicable time period for corrective actions to be completed.
(8) If the authorized local health department determines that
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


an evaluation report under subsection (6) identifies the need for
the septic tank or tanks to be pumped, the owner of the onsite
wastewater treatment system shall have the tank or tanks pumped by
a septage waste servicing business licensed under part 117 of the
natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451,
MCL 324.11701 to 324.11721, not later than 60 days after the
evaluation report is received under subsection (6).
(9) Subject to subsection (11), if the owner of an onsite
wastewater treatment system or the owner of the premises or
structure not connected to a public sanitary sewer fails to arrange
for an onsite wastewater treatment system evaluation, fails to have
the system evaluated in accordance with the requirements of this
section, or fails to complete corrective actions identified under
subsection (7)(d), the owner is subject to the following:
(a) Beginning 60 days after the end of the applicable time
period under subsection (2), (3), or (7) and in the absence of good
cause shown by the owner under subsection (11), a civil fine of not
more than $250.00 for each 30-day period that the system remains
unevaluated or corrective actions remain incomplete.
(b) Beginning 1 year after the end of the applicable time
period and in the absence of good cause shown, a civil fine of not
more than $500.00 for each 30-day period that the system remains
unevaluated or corrective action remains incomplete, up to
$15,000.00 in total civil fines under this subsection.
(10) Subject to subsection (11), if the authorized local
health department determines that an evaluation report under
subsection (6) identifies evidence of failure, the owner of the
onsite wastewater treatment system or the owner of the premises or
structure shall remedy the failure within 6 months after the
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


evaluation report is received under subsection (6) or within a time
period determined by the authorized local health department. An
owner that violates this subsection is subject to a civil fine of
not more than $1,000.00 for each 30-day period that the failure
continues. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation
occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect the
fine and require remedy of the failure.
(11) The department may waive any fine authorized under
subsections (9) and (10) if the owner of the onsite wastewater
treatment system or the owner of the premises or structure not
connected to a public sanitary sewer demonstrates either of the
following:
(a) That the owner's income is at or below 400% of the federal
poverty guidelines, as published annually in the Federal Register
by the United States Department of Health and Human Services under
its authority to revise the poverty line under 42 USC 9902, and
that not later than 1 year after the owner had a completed
evaluation under this section or remedied any failure identified in
the onsite wastewater treatment system evaluation under subsection
(7). An extension to the 1-year timeline described under this
subdivision may be granted in accordance with the rules promulgated
under section 12817.
(b) That the payment of any fines under subsection (9) or
(10), or both, would pose significant financial stress on the owner
of the system and that not later than 1 year of the owner of the
system completed an evaluation under this section or remedied any
failure identified in the onsite wastewater treatment system
evaluation under subsection (7).
(12) In accordance with the statewide sewage code, if
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


determined necessary by the department and on request of an owner
of an onsite wastewater treatment system, the department may grant
a variance from the onsite wastewater treatment system evaluation
requirements under this section.
(13) An authorized local health department or evaluator may
charge a fee for conducting an onsite wastewater treatment system
evaluation. An authorized local health department may charge a
reasonable fee not to exceed the costs of conducting,
administering, and reviewing onsite wastewater treatment system
evaluations.
(14) In addition to the fee charged for conducting an onsite
treatment system evaluation under subsection (13), an authorized
local health department or evaluator, as applicable, shall charge
an additional $50.00 state administrative fee. An evaluator shall
submit the administrative fee to the department at the same time an
evaluation report is submitted under subsection (6). State
administrative fees collected by a local health department must be
forwarded to the department on a quarterly basis. Beginning 3 years
after the effective date of the statewide sewage code, and every 3
years thereafter, the department shall adjust the state
administrative fee in this subsection by an amount determined by
the state treasurer to reflect the cumulative annual percentage
change in the Consumer Price Index. As used in this subsection,
"Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of
consumer prices available for this state from the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(15) All state administrative fees and civil fines authorized
and collected under this section must be forwarded to the state
treasurer for deposit into the fund.
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


(16) Beginning 2 years after the first civil fine is imposed
under subsection (9)(a), the civil fine constitutes a recorded lien
when filed at the register of deeds office on the real property
owned by the owner of the onsite wastewater treatment system or the
premises or structure from which the sanitary sewage originates. A
recorded lien under this subsection is effective and has priority
over all other liens and encumbrances except those filed or
recorded before the date the notice of the lien is filed or
recorded only if notice of the lien is filed or recorded as
required by state or federal law. A lien filed or recorded under
this subsection is terminated in accordance with the procedures
required by state or federal law not later than 14 days after the
owner has the system evaluated and pays the civil fine.
Sec. 12823. (1) Subject to subsection (2), to apply for a
registration as an evaluator, an individual shall meet the training
requirements established in the statewide sewage code and submit an
application on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department.
The department may charge a $180.00 application fee to cover the
department's costs under this section. An application fee collected
under this section must be forwarded to the state treasurer for
deposit into the fund.
(2) Beginning on the effective date of the statewide sewage
code and for 3 years thereafter, an evaluator who has 3 years of
work experience, as determined by the department, does not have to
comply with the training requirements established in the statewide
sewage code.
(3) All evaluation reports received under section 12821(5) are
subject to an audit by the department. The department may
promulgate rules under section 12817 to implement an audit
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


authorized under this subsection. The department may suspend or
revoke a registration under subsection (5) following an audit
authorized under this subsection.
(4) A registration granted under this section is valid for 3
years. The department shall review individuals registered under
this section once every 3 years and renew a registration for any
individual who submits a renewal application and fee and who
continues to meet continuing education requirements. The department
may establish renewal fees or late fees. A registration described
under this section is nontransferable.
(5) A registration under this section may be denied,
suspended, or revoked following a contested case hearing conducted
in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969
PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, for any of the following reasons:
(a) The use of fraud or deceit in obtaining or renewing a
registration.
(b) An act of gross negligence, incompetence, or misconduct in
conducting or reporting on an onsite wastewater treatment system
evaluation.
(c) The failure to satisfactorily complete continuing
education requirements specified under the statewide sewage code.
(d) The submission of an evaluation report knowingly based on
false, incorrect, misleading, or fabricated information.
(e) The failure to submit an evaluation report.
(f) The failure to pay a required fee.
(g) The failure to meet the ethical standards established in
the statewide sewage code.
(h) Conviction in a civil or criminal proceeding or failure to
comply with a judgment or order that is issued by a court in
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


connection with a matter related to the conduct necessary to
provide the services of an evaluator.
(i) Any other violation of this part, part 127, the rules
promulgated under part 127, or the statewide sewage code.
(6) The department shall maintain a list of individuals
registered under this section and make the list available on the
department's website.
Sec. 12825. (1) The department shall develop and make
available minimum standards and criteria for conducting evaluations
and forms for use in documenting the management of onsite
wastewater treatment systems, including evaluation report forms for
onsite wastewater treatment system evaluations conducted under
section 12821.
(2) Ten years after the effective date of the amendatory act
that added this section, the department shall prepare and submit a
report to the legislature and governor that analyzes and evaluates
the results of the implementation of the statewide sewage code,
outlines needed areas of improvement, and assesses adjusting the
evaluation timelines specified under section 12821(2) and (3) based
on program data and trends.
(3) The department shall make available and maintain an on-
site wastewater treatment system electronic database for recording
and tracking the locations of onsite wastewater treatment systems
in this state and the findings of onsite wastewater treatment
system evaluations. The department may require an authorized local
health department to input the data described under this subsection
into the onsite wastewater treatment system electronic database.
The department shall provide authenticated access to the onsite
wastewater treatment system electronic database. The onsite
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


wastewater treatment system electronic database must contain all of
the following information:
(a) An evaluation report completed under section 12821. The
department may require an authorized local health department or
evaluator to electronically enter the report information into the
onsite wastewater treatment system electronic database instead of
the written report.
(b) Documentation and records from authorized local health
departments regarding the locations and previous evaluation or
inspection records of onsite wastewater treatment systems.
(c) Any other data, information, or record determined relevant
by the department.
(4) The onsite wastewater treatment system electronic database
created under subsection (3) must provide authenticated access to
authorized users to maintain the protected status of any sensitive
personal information contained within the database.
Sec. 12827. (1) Except as provided under section 12821(9) and
(10), a person, an owner of an onsite wastewater treatment system,
or an owner of a premises or structure that is not connected to a
public sanitary sewer system that fails to comply with this part,
part 127, a rule promulgated under part 127, or the statewide
sewage code is subject to the following:
(a) For a first violation, the person is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, a
fine of not less than $500.00 or more than $2,000.00, or both.
(b) For a second or subsequent violation, the person is guilty
of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more 180 days,
a fine of not less than $1,000.00 or more than $10,000.00, or both.
(2) Each day that a violation continues constitutes a separate
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


violation under subsection (1).
(3) When the department or an authorized local health
department determines that there are reasonable grounds to believe
there has been a violation of this part, part 127, the rules
promulgated under part 127, or the statewide sewage code, the
authorized local health department shall investigate the violation.
If the authorized local health department determines there has been
a violation, the department or authorized local health department
shall issue a notice and penalty, as applicable, under section
12803(1)(a)(ii) and order the responsible party to make corrections
to be in compliance with this part, part 127, the rules promulgated
under part 127, and the statewide sewage code.
(4) The prosecutor of the county in which the violation
occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect a
fine authorized under this section and require compliance with this
part, part 127, the rules promulgated under part 127, and the
statewide sewage code.
(5) A civil fine authorized and collected under this section
must be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit into the fund.
(6) The department or an authorized local health department
may request that the attorney general or prosecutor of the county
in which the violation occurred commence a civil action for
appropriate relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction,
for a violation of this part, part 127, the statewide sewage code,
or a provision of a permit or order issued under this part or part
127. An action under this subsection may be brought in the circuit
court for Ingham County or for the county in which the defendant is
located, resides, or is doing business. If requested by the
defendant, within 21 days after service of process, the court shall
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


grant a change of venue to the circuit court for Ingham County or
for the county in which the alleged violation occurred, is
occurring, or, in the event of a threat of violation, will occur.
The court has jurisdiction to restrain the violation and require
compliance. In addition to any other relief granted under this
subsection, the court, except as otherwise provided in this
section, shall impose a civil fine of not less than $2,500.00, and
the court may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the
prevailing party.
(7) Final decision-making authority with respect to this part,
part 127, the rules promulgated under part 127, and the statewide
sewage code remains with the department. An authorized local health
department may perform delegated functions authorized by and with
direction from the department in accordance with the statewide
sewage code, but the department maintains ultimate enforcement
authority.
Sec. 12829. (1) The onsite wastewater treatment system
administration fund is created in the state treasury.
(2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from
any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall
direct the investment of the fund and credit to the fund interest
and earnings from fund investments.
(3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains
in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund.
(4) The department is the administrator of the fund for
auditing purposes.
(5) The department shall expend money from the fund, on
appropriation, only for the following purposes:
(a) To administer this part.
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


(b) For grants to local health departments to carry out their
responsibilities under this part, including, but not limited to,
for the digitization of records of locations relating to onsite
wastewater treatment systems and the locations of drinking water
supply sources, including, but not limited to, onsite water wells
or a public water supply. As used in this subdivision:
(i) "Public water supply" means that term as defined in section
2 of the safe drinking water act, 1976 PA 399, MCL 325.1002.
(ii) "Well" means that term as defined in section 12701.
(c) For grants or loans to homeowners who are below 400% of
the federal poverty level for all associated costs applicable to
remedy a failure of an onsite wastewater treatment system
identified under section 12821 or to provide funds to compensate
for an arranged onsite wastewater treatment system evaluation. As
used in this subdivision, "federal poverty level" means the federal
poverty guidelines published annually in the Federal Register by
the United States Department of Health and Human Services under its
authority to revise the poverty line under 42 USC 9902.
(d) To administer a public outreach and educational campaign
to inform individuals on the requirements of section 12821 and the
importance of operation and maintenance of onsite wastewater
treatment systems.
(6) The department may contract with a qualified third-party
administrator to manage grants and loans made from the fund.
Sec. 12831. (1) If a local unit of government, county, or
local health department has a point of sale ordinance to require
evaluations of onsite wastewater treatment systems, the point of
sale ordinance must be consistent with and as stringent as the
requirements under this part. Local ordinances must meet the
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u


requirements of sections 1115 and 2441.
(2) A point of sale ordinance may address occupancy in a
manner that complies with the regulations of the local health
department and is otherwise applicable to property of the same
type.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Local unit of government" means a township, city, or
village in this state.
(b) "Point of sale ordinance" means any ordinance or
regulation that requires an inspection or evaluation of onsite
wastewater treatment systems at or before the point of sale.
Sec. 12833. The department, under parts 31 and 41 of the
natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451,
MCL 324.3101 to 324.3134 and 324.4101 to 324.4113, and this act,
and local health departments under this act, have exclusive
jurisdiction over the regulation, permitting, and evaluation of
onsite wastewater treatment systems.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days
after the date it is enacted into law.
Final Page
RMH S01151'25 (S-2) shci9u